Connecticut, session 2026, SB00334.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 7-148b of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section and sections 7-148c to 7-148f,
inclusive, "seasonal basis" means housing accommodations rented for a
period or periods aggregating not more than one hundred twenty days
in any one calendar year, "rental charge" includes any fee or charge in
addition to rent that is imposed or sought to be imposed upon a tenant
by a landlord, and "municipality" means a town, city or consolidated
town and city.
(b) Any municipality may, and each municipality with a population
of fifteen thousand or more, as determined by the most recent decennial
census, shall, through its legislative body, adopt an ordinance that (1)
creates a fair rent commission, (2) establishes or joins the municipality
in a joint fair rent commission pursuant to subsection (d) of this section,
LCO No. 2002 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 334
or (3) joins the municipality in a regional fair rent commission pursuant
to subsection (e) of this section. Any such commission shall make
studies and investigations, conduct hearings and receive complaints
relative to rental charges on housing accommodations, except those
accommodations rented on a seasonal basis, within its jurisdiction,
which term shall include mobile manufactured homes and mobile
manufactured home park lots, in order to control and eliminate
excessive rental charges on such accommodations, and to carry out the
provisions of sections 7-148b to 7-148f, inclusive, section 47a-20 and
subsection (b) of section 47a-23c. The commission, for such purposes,
may compel the attendance of persons at hearings, issue subpoenas and
administer oaths, issue orders and continue, review, amend, terminate
or suspend any of its orders and decisions. The commission may be
empowered to retain legal counsel to advise it. All hearings conducted
pursuant to this section shall be open to the public.
(c) Any municipality required to create a fair rent commission
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall adopt an ordinance
creating a fair rent commission, or joining a joint fair rent commission
or regional fair rent commission, on or before January 1, 2028. No
municipality required to create a fair rent commission pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section that has created a fair rent commission
prior to January 1, 2026, shall abolish such commission before January
1, 2028, unless such municipality joins a joint fair rent commission or
regional fair rent commission pursuant to this section. Not later than
thirty days after the adoption of such ordinance, the chief executive
officer of such municipality shall (1) notify the Commissioner of
Housing that such commission has been created or joined by such
municipality, and (2) transmit a copy of the ordinance adopted by the
municipality to the commissioner.
(d) Two or more contiguous municipalities may, by concurrent
ordinances adopted by their legislative bodies, establish a joint fair rent
commission. Any municipality that is contiguous to a municipality that
is a member of an existing joint fair rent commission may become a
LCO No. 2002 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 334
member of such joint fair rent commission upon the adoption of an
ordinance by such municipality's legislative body. Any municipality
that is a member of a joint fair rent commission may, by vote of its
legislative body, elect to withdraw from such commission, provided
such withdrawing municipality creates its own fair rent commission or
joins another joint fair rent commission or regional fair rent commission
in compliance with the requirements of this section.
(e) A regional council of governments formed pursuant to section 4-
124j may establish a regional fair rent commission. Any municipality
that is a member of such council may join such regional fair rent
commission upon the adoption of an ordinance by such municipality's
legislative body. Any regional fair rent commission shall prescribe a
form and manner in which complaints to such commission shall be
made.
(f) Upon the request of a party to a matter pending before a regional
fair rent commission, a meeting or a portion of a meeting during which
the participation of such party is required shall be conducted by means
of electronic equipment, as defined in section 1-200, in conjunction with
an in-person meeting of such commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided by law, a regional fair rent
commission shall not be liable for damages to person or property caused
by: (A) Acts or omissions of any employee, officer or agent which
constitute criminal conduct, fraud, actual malice or wilful misconduct;
or (B) negligent acts or omissions which require the exercise of judgment
or discretion as an official function of the authority expressly or
impliedly granted by law.
(h) Any municipality that creates a fair rent commission pursuant to
this section shall make any bylaws adopted by such fair rent
commission publicly available on the Internet web site of such
municipality.
(i) On and after January 1, 2027, any municipal, joint or regional fair
LCO No. 2002 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 334
rent commission established pursuant to this section shall consist of fifty
per cent landlords who own residential property within its jurisdiction
and fifty per cent individuals who are tenants of residential property
within its jurisdiction.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148b